Oklahoma, session 2025, SB344.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 37A O.S. 2021, Section 6-108, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 6-108. No holder of a Retail Wine License retail wine
license or a Retail Beer License retail beer license shall:
1. Purchase or receive any alcoholic beverage other than from a
wine and spirits wholesaler, beer distributor, winery or small
brewer self-distribution licensee;
2. Suffer or permit any retail container to be opened, or any
alcoholic beverage to be consumed on the licensed premises, except
when serving samples as authorized by Section 2-109 of this title or
as otherwise permitted by law; provided, the licensee shall not
permit any alcoholic beverages content or retail container unsealed
in connection with sampling authorized by Section 2-109 of this
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB344 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

titl e to remain on the licensed premises at the close of the
business on that day;
3. Sell any beer or wine at any hour other than between the
hours of 6:00 a.m. and 2:00 a.m. the following day, Monday through
Sunday. Retail wine and retail beer licensees shall be permitted to
sell beer and wine on the day of any General, Primary, Runoff
Primary or Special Election whether on a national, state, county or
city election;
4. Sell any beer and wine on credit; except as follows:
a. the acceptance by a grocery store, convenience store
or drug store of a cash or debit card, or a nationally
recognized credit card, in lieu of actual cash payment
does not constitute the extension of credit; provided,
further, as used in this section:
(1) “cash or debit card” means any instrument or
device whether known as a debit card or by any
other name, issued with or without fee by an
issuer for the use of the cardholder in
depositing, obtaining or transferring funds from
a consumer banking electronic facility, and
(2) “nationally recognized credit card” means any
instrument or device, whether known as a credit
card, credit plate, charge plate or by any other
name, issued with or without fee by an issuer for
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB344 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

the use of the cardholder in obtaining money,
goods, services or anything else of value on
credit which is accepted by over one hundred
retail locations, and
b. when the holder of a Retail Wine License retail wine
license, Retail Beer License retail beer license, or
Mixed Beverage License mixed beverage license is a
private membership club, marina, golf course or
country club that normally charges food, drinks and
other purchases to the member’s monthly dues account
in the regular course of business, in lieu of actual
cash payment at the time of purchase, such practice
does not constitute the extension of credit;
5. Offer or furnish any prize, premium, gift or similar
inducement to a consumer in connection with the sale of beer or
wine, except that:
a. goods or merchandise included by the manufacturer in
packaging with beer or wine or for packaging with beer
or wine shall not be included in this prohibition, nor
shall a retail wine or retail beer license holder
selling wine or beer at a multiunit discount be
included in this prohibition; but provided, that no
retail wine or retail beer licensee shall sell any
beer or wine prepackaged with other goods or
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB344 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

merchandise at a price which is greater than the price
at which the alcoholic beverage alone is sold, and
b. retail packages at discount, at the discretion of the
licensee, for individuals of specific professions and
current or former members of the United States Armed
Forces. No discount shall make the retail price lower
than six-percent markup as applicable in Section 3-118
of this title; or
6. Pay for beer or wine by a check or draft which is dishonored
by the drawee when presented to such drawee for payment; and the
ABLE Alcoholic Beverage Laws Enforcement (ABLE) Commission may
cancel or suspend the license of any retailer who has given a check
or draft, as maker or endorser, which is so dishonored upon
presentation.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON BUSINESS AND INSURANCE
February 13, 2025 - DO PASS








SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB344 SFLR Page 4
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)